Massachusetts, session 194th, S1180.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2(c) of 258C of the General Laws is hereby repealed.  
SECTION 2. Section (3) of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection 1 in its entirety inserting in place 
thereof the following paragraph:- 
(1)(A)  The maximum award or compensation for funeral and burial expenses shall be 
$15,000.  A legal guardian, dependent or other family member of the victim or a person who 
incurs funeral and burial expenses directly related to the death of a victim shall be eligible for 
compensation for such funeral and burial expenses. 
SECTION 3. Section (5) of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection 1, and inserting in place thereof 
the following section:- 

of 2 12  (1)(A) A claim for compensation under this chapter shall be filed within five years of the 
date of the crime.